Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.140

Washington scholars' program—Principals' association to submit names to office of student financial assistance.

Each year on or before March 1st, the Washington association of secondary school principals shall submit to the office of student financial assistance the names of graduating senior high school students who have been identified and recommended to be outstanding in academic achievement by their school principals based on criteria to be established under RCW 28A.600.130.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 128; 1990 c 33 s 501; 1985 c 370 s 34; 1981 c 54 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.58.828.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Severability—1981 c 54: See note following RCW 28A.600.100.